Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0617

Committees.

(1) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint one or more individuals to serve on a committee.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, an individual appointed to serve on a committee of a limited cooperative association need not be a director or member.

(3) An individual who is not a director and is serving on a committee has the same rights, duties, and obligations as a director serving on the committee.

(4) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, each committee of a limited cooperative association may exercise the powers delegated to it by the board of directors, but a committee may not:

(a) Approve allocations or distributions except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors;

(b) Approve or propose to members action requiring approval of members; or

(c) Fill vacancies on the board of directors or any of its committees.

[ 2019 c 37 s 617.]